Tennessee, session 114, SB2684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-106, is amended by deleting the
language "on or before February 1 of each subsequent year until February 1, 2030" and
substituting instead the language "on or before February 15 of each subsequent year until
February 15, 2030".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2684
012758
- 1 -